District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.16

Agreements with governments of other jurisdictions and other entities.

The District may negotiate and enter into purchasing alliances and regional strategies with the governments of other jurisdictions, and with other public and private entities, for the purpose of reducing prescription drug prices for residents of the District.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 116, 51 DCR 3688